South Dakota, session 2026, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-20B:
A person who sells, distributes, purchases, consumes, or possesses kratom, a
kratom product, or a product containing synthetic mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine,
is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 2. That § 34-20B-115 be REPEALED.
Any of the following actions are unlawful:
(1) To knowingly sell or distribute a kratom product to a person under the age of
twenty-one;
(2) The purchase or attempt to purchase, the receipt or attempt to receive, the
possession, or the consumption of a kratom product by a person under the age of
twenty-one; or
(3) To purchase a kratom product on behalf of, or to give a kratom product to, any
person under the age of twenty-one, unless the purchaser is a parent or guardian
of the person under the age of twenty-one.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 3. That § 34-20B-115.1 be REPEALED.
No person may prepare, sell, or distribute a kratom product that:
(1) Contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater
than two percent of the alkaloid composition of the product;
(2) Contains synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other
synthetic alkaloid or synthetically derived compound from the Mitragyna speciosa
plant;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.842.9 2 1151
(3) Contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious non-kratom substance, including
any substance designated as a controlled substance by this chapter;
(4) Is mixed or packed with a non-kratom substance that affects the quality or strength
of the kratom product, rendering the product injurious to a customer;
(5) Does not include on its package or label the recommended serving size of the
kratom product, a recommended number of servings that can be safely consumed
in a twenty-four-hour period, and a list of servings per container;
(6) Does not include on its package or label the amount of mitragynine and 7-
hydroxymitragynine contained in the kratom product; or
(7) Does not include on its package or label the following warning statement: "Consult
a licensed, qualified healthcare professional before consuming this product. Not for
use by women who are pregnant, nursing, or trying to become pregnant."
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.